src/morphology/stems/new_words_from_stories.lexc
LEXICON NU_ADV
aabtoowyiinh    # "halfway up the hill" ; !syncope problems, aabtoo- is clearly half, but I can't find a word related to hill
edwenik:eyedawikana # "both arms, both sides of the road" ;
gaa'shii:gaashwii # ; !gaa(wiin)+dash+wiin
giiwenh # "so it is said" ; !also giiyenh?
gyak:gwayak # ;
maanaa # ; !negative
maj # "bad" ; !maybe related to maji-, maybe IPC
mnopii # "good distance" ; !mno-pii
nake # ; !already defined as adv, might be something else
niiyiing    # "at that place" ; !analyzed as compound of niwi and ya'ii
noonj    # "more" ; !contraction of nwanj
nsawyiing    # "between, middle" ;
shkweyiing:íshkweyaang # "at the end, last" ; !RV relates to shkweyaang, maybe also eshkweyiing
wenjida    # "deliberately" ; !phonology problem, looks like initial change, maybe taken from CCNJ verb?
wewiikaa # ; !redup of wiikaa
zhaazhgo # ;
edweyiing:edaweyiing    # "flanking, on both sides" ;
gnimaage    # ;
zhaazhgo:zhaazhigo    # "already" ; !phonological problems, orthographic problems
naanoomye:naanoomaye    # "more recently" ;
Etaawegiizhik    # ; !note says this is a name but also is listed as an adverb? similar looking name in NA list

LEXICON NU_PRON_NA
wegwendig # "somebody" ; !dubitative pronoun
wenenan    # "who.Obv" ; !is this just wenen with the obviative suffix? also, irrational compounding

LEXICON NU_PRON_NI
wi:iwe    # ;

LEXICON NU_PA
PA/maanji-    # ; !phonological problem with first V not being deleted with reduplication

LEXICON NU_PV
PV/ji- # "in order to" ; !West
PV/maawnji- # ; !superlative
PV/mdwe+:madwe-    # "audibly" ;

LEXICON NU_PN
PN/agaami- # "across a body of water" ; !similar to AV/gaaming

LEXICON NU_IPC
wiin # ; !negative contrastive discourse particle

LEXICON NU_SUFFIX
-g # "2pl imperative" ;
-ini # "Indep" ;
-nid # "Cnj" ;
-nind    # "3Obv Cnj" ; !this might have just been a typo

LEXICON NU_INTERJ
inashke # "look" ;
yaa-aa    # "oh my" ; !variant of yaa
